Maine, session 132, LD321.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §150-V is enacted to read:
§150-V. Progressive Supranuclear Palsy Month
The month of May of each year is designated as Progressive Supranuclear Palsy Month,
and the Governor shall issue annually a proclamation inviting and urging the people of the
State to observe the month through appropriate activities.
Page 1 - 132LR1096(02)